California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) When a citation imposes an education course or courses, the completion of the course or courses by the licensee shall be subject to the following conditions:

(A) The citation imposing the education requirement may specify the specific course content, the number of hours to be completed, the date by which the course is to be completed, and the method by which
 satisfaction of the order is to be reported to the bureau.

(B) An education course imposed by citation may not be credited towards the licensee’s continuing education requirements pursuant to Section 11360.

(C) Only courses accredited by the bureau shall be accepted for purposes of fulfilling education imposed by citation.

(D) Any failure to satisfactorily complete or timely report an education course to the bureau by the date specified in the citation shall result in the automatic suspension of the licensee’s real estate appraiser license as of that date. A license shall not be renewed prior to the satisfactory completion of an education course specified in the citation, unless the citation provides for a completion date
 that is subsequent to the license renewal date.

(E) Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to subparagraph (D) shall be made only if all of the following events occur:

(i) Satisfactory verification of the completion of the education course or courses imposed by the citation.

(ii) Completion and filing of a reinstatement application.

(iii) Payment of all applicable fees, fines, or penalties.

(e) In no event shall an administrative fine assessed by the bureau by citation or order exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. In assessing a fine, the bureau shall give due consideration to the
 appropriateness of the amount of the fine with respect to factors such as the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the person who committed the violation, and the history of previous violations.

(f) A citation or fine assessment issued pursuant to a citation shall inform the person cited that, if the person desires a hearing to contest the finding of a violation, the person is required to request a hearing by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation or assessment. Hearings shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The citation or fine assessment shall also inform the person cited that failure to respond to the citation or fine assessment shall result in any order or administrative fine imposed becoming
 final, and that any order or administrative fine shall constitute an enforceable civil judgment in addition to any other penalty or remedy available pursuant to law.

(g) (1) If a licensee, applicant for licensure, person who acts in a capacity that requires a license under this part, course provider, applicant for course provider accreditation, or a person who, or entity that, acts in a capacity that requires course provider accreditation fails to pay a fine, penalty, or required installment payment on the fine or penalty by the date when it is due, the director shall charge the person interest and a penalty of 10 percent of the fine or installment payment amount. Interest shall be charged at the pooled money investment rate.

(2) Failure of a licensee, applicant for
 licensure, person who acts in a capacity that requires a license under this part, course provider, applicant for course provider accreditation, or a person who, or entity that, acts in a capacity that requires course provider accreditation to pay a fine or required installment payment on the fine within 30 days of the date ordered in the citation, unless the citation is being appealed, shall be cause for additional disciplinary action by the bureau.

(3) If a citation is not contested and a fine or fine payment is not paid within 30 days of the date ordered in the citation or other order of the director, the full amount of the unpaid balance of the assessed fine shall be added to any fee for renewal of a license. A license shall not be renewed prior to payment of the renewal fee and fine.

(4) The director may order the full amount of any fine to be immediately due and payable if any payment due on a fine is not received by the bureau within 30 days of its due date.

(5) Any fine, or interest thereon, not paid within 30 days of a final citation or order shall constitute a valid and enforceable civil judgment.

(6) A certified copy of the final order, or the citation with certification by the bureau that no request for hearing was received within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation, shall be conclusive proof of the civil judgment, its terms, and its validity.

(h) A citation may be issued without the assessment of an administrative fine.

(i) Any administrative fine or penalty imposed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other criminal or civil penalty provided for by law.

(j) Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 42.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11315.1.

(a) The director may issue to a registrant or person who acts in a capacity that requires a certificate of registration under this part, a citation that may contain an order to pay an administrative fine assessed by the office, if the person is in violation of this part or any regulations adopted to carry out its purposes.

(b) A citation shall be written and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a specific reference to the provision of law determined to have been violated.

(c) If appropriate, the citation may contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation.

(d) In no event shall an administrative fine assessed by the office by citation or order exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. In assessing a fine, the office shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the amount of the fine with respect to factors such as the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the person that committed the violation, and the history of previous violations.

(e) A citation or fine assessment issued pursuant to a citation shall inform the person cited that, if the person desires a hearing to contest the finding of a violation, he or she or one of its controlling persons must request a hearing by written notice to the office within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation or assessment. Hearings shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The citation or fine assessment shall also inform the
 person cited that failure to respond to the citation or fine assessment shall result in any order or administrative fine imposed becoming final, and that any order or administrative fine shall constitute an enforceable civil judgment in addition to any other penalty or remedy available pursuant to law.

(f) (1) If a registrant or person who acts in a capacity that requires a certificate of registration fails to pay a fine, penalty, or required installment payment on the fine or penalty by the date when it is due, the director shall charge that person interest and a penalty of the fine or installment payment amount. Interest shall be charged at the pooled money investment rate.

(2) Failure of a registrant or person who requires a certificate of registration to pay a fine or required installment payment on the fine within 30 days of the date ordered in the
 citation, unless the citation is being appealed, shall be cause for additional disciplinary action by the office.

(3) If a citation is not contested and a fine or fine payment is not paid within 30 days of the date ordered in the citation or other order of the director, the full amount of the unpaid balance of the assessed fine shall be added to any fee for renewal of a certificate of registration. A certificate of registration shall not be renewed prior to payment of the renewal fee and fine.

(4) The director may order the full amount of any fine to be immediately due and payable if any payment due on a fine is not received by the office within 30 days of its due date.

(5) Any fine, or interest thereon, not paid within 30 days of a final citation or order shall constitute a valid and enforceable civil judgment.

(6) A certified copy of the final order, or the citation with certification by the office that no request for hearing was received within 30 days of the date of issuance of the citation, shall be conclusive proof of the civil judgment, its terms, and its validity.

(g) A citation may be issued without the assessment of an administrative fine.

(h) Any administrative fine or penalty imposed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other criminal or civil penalty provided for by law.

(i) Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 173, Sec. 3.   (SB 237)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11315.3.

The suspension, expiration, or forfeiture by operation of law of a license or certificate of registration issued by the office, or its suspension, forfeiture, or cancellation by order of the office or by order of a court of law, or its surrender without the written consent of the office, shall not, during any period in which it may be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated, deprive the office of its authority to institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against the licensee or registrant upon any ground provided by law or to enter an order suspending or revoking the license or certificate of registration, or otherwise taking disciplinary action against the licensee or registrant on any such ground.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 683, Sec. 2.   (AB 2519)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11315.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office may, at any time the director deems it to be in the public interest, enter into a settlement of any administrative allegation of violation of this part, or of regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, upon any terms and conditions as the director deems appropriate. Those settlements may include, but are not limited to, a plan for abatement of the violation or rehabilitation or requalification of the applicant, licensed appraiser, course provider, registrant, or person acting in a capacity requiring a license, certificate of registration, or course provider accreditation within a specified time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 173, Sec. 4.   (SB 237)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11316.

(a) The director may assess a fine against a licensee, applicant for licensure, person who acts in a capacity that requires a license under this part, course provider, applicant for course provider accreditation, or a person who, or entity that, acts in a capacity that requires course provider accreditation for violation of this part or any regulations adopted to carry out its purposes.

(b) (1) Failure of a licensee, applicant for licensure, person who acts in a capacity that requires a license under this part, course provider, applicant for course provider accreditation, or a person who, or entity that, acts in a capacity that requires course provider accreditation to pay a fine or make a fine payment within 30 days of the date of assessment shall result in disciplinary action by the office. If a licensee, applicant for licensure, person who acts in a capacity that requires a license under this part, course provider, applicant for course provider accreditation, or a person who, or entity that, acts in a capacity that requires course provider accreditation fails to pay a fine within 30 days, the director shall charge him or her interest and a penalty of 10 percent of the fine or payment amount. Interest shall be charged at the pooled money investment rate.

(2) If a fine is not paid, the full amount of the assessed fine shall be added to any fee for renewal of a license. A license shall not be renewed prior to payment of the renewal fee and fine.

(3) The director may order the full amount of any fine to be immediately due and payable if any payment on the fine, or portion thereof, is not received within 30 days of its due date.

(4) Any fine, or interest thereon, not paid within 30 days of a final order shall constitute a valid and enforceable civil judgment.

(5) A certified copy of the final order shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms of payment.

(c) Any administrative fine or penalty imposed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other criminal or civil penalty provided for by law.

(d) Administrative fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Real Estate Appraisers Regulation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 790, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

11317.

The office shall publish a summary of public disciplinary actions taken by the office, including resignations while under investigation and the violations upon which these actions are based, which shall meet, at a minimum, the requirements of the appraisal subcommittee. The office shall not publish identifying information with respect to private reprovals or letters of warning, which shall remain confidential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 790, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

11317.2.

(a) (1) In addition to publishing the summary required by Section 11317, the bureau shall provide on the internet information regarding the status of every license and registration issued by the bureau in accordance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(2) The public information to be provided on the internet shall include information on suspensions and revocations of licenses and registrations issued by the bureau and accusations filed pursuant
 to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) relative to persons or businesses subject to licensure, registration, or regulation by the bureau.

(3) The information shall not include personal information, including home telephone number, date of birth, or social security number. The bureau shall disclose a licensee’s or registrant’s address of record. However, the bureau shall allow a licensee or registrant to provide a post office box number or other alternate address, instead of the licensee’s home address, as the address of record. This section shall not preclude the bureau from also requiring a licensee or registrant who has provided a post office box number or other alternative mailing address as the licensee’s address of record to provide a
 physical business address or residence address only for the bureau’s internal administrative use and not for disclosure as the licensee’s or registrant’s address of record or disclosure on the internet.

(4) In addition to the information required by subdivision (a), the bureau shall provide, on the internet, the continuing education course information provided by a licensee when an individual applies for licensure renewal.

(b) The bureau shall not provide on the internet identifying information with respect to private reprovals or letters of warning, which shall remain confidential.

(c) (1) (A) Except as specified in subparagraph (B), upon petition by a licensee that is accompanied by a fee sufficient to defray administrative costs associated with consideration of a petition pursuant to this subdivision, the bureau may remove from the posting of discipline described in subdivision (a) an item that has been posted on the bureau’s internet website for no less than 10 years and for which the licensee provides evidence of rehabilitation indicating that the notice is no longer required in order to prevent a credible risk to members of the public utilizing licensed activity of the licensee.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a licensee shall not petition to remove from the posting of discipline described in subdivision (a) either of the following:

(i) A license revocation.

(ii) A voluntary surrender that was the result of a pending investigation.

(C) In evaluating a
 petition filed pursuant to this subdivision, the bureau shall take into consideration other violations that present a credible risk to the members of the public since the posting of discipline requested for removal.

(2) The bureau may develop, through regulations, the amount of the fee and the minimum information to be included in a licensee’s petition pursuant to paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, a written justification and evidence of rehabilitation pursuant to Section 482.

(d) (1) Upon petition by an immediate family member or heir of a deceased licensee that is accompanied by a fee sufficient to defray administrative costs associated with consideration of a petition pursuant to this subdivision, the bureau may
 remove from the posting of discipline described in subdivision (a) an item that has been posted on the bureau’s internet website with regard to the deceased licensee for any duration.

(2) The bureau may develop, through regulations, the amount of the fee and the minimum information to be included in a petition pursuant to paragraph (1).

(e) The bureau shall maintain a list of all licensees whose disciplinary records are altered as a result of a petition approved under subdivision (c) or (d). The bureau shall make the list accessible to other licensing bodies. The bureau shall update and provide the list to other licensing bodies as often as it modifies the records displayed on its internet website in response to petitions approved under subdivision (c) or (d). 

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Internet” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (f) of Section 17538.

(2) “Posted” for purposes of this section is defined as the date of disciplinary action taken by the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 461, Sec. 1.   (SB 1225)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11318.

(a) A licensee, applicant for licensure, course provider, or applicant for course provider accreditation shall report to the office, in writing, the occurrence of any of the following events within 30 days of the date he or she has knowledge of any of these events:

(1) The bringing of an indictment or information charging a felony against the licensee, applicant for licensure, course provider, or applicant for course provider accreditation.

(2) The conviction of the licensee, applicant for licensure, course provider, or applicant for course provider accreditation of any felony or misdemeanor.

As used in this section, a conviction includes an initial plea, verdict, or finding of guilty, plea of no contest, or pronouncement of sentence by a trial court even though that conviction may not be final, the sentence may not be imposed, or all appeals may not be exhausted.

(3) The cancellation, revocation, or suspension of a license, other authority to practice, or refusal to renew a license or other authority to practice as an occupational or professional licensee or course provider, by any other regulatory entity.

(4) The cancellation, revocation, or suspension of the right to practice before any governmental body or agency.

(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall be signed by the licensee, applicant for licensure, course provider, or applicant for course provider
 accreditation and clearly set forth the facts that constitute the reportable event. The report shall include the title of the matter, court or agency name, docket number, and dates of occurrence of the reportable event.

(c) The licensee, applicant for licensure, course provider, or applicant for course provider accreditation shall also promptly obtain and submit a certified copy of the police or administrative agency’s investigative report and certified copies of the court or administrative agency’s docket, complaint or accusation, and judgment or other order.

(d) A licensee, applicant for licensure, course provider, or applicant for course provider accreditation shall promptly respond to oral or written inquiries from the office concerning the reportable events.

(e) Failure to make a report required by subdivision
 (a) shall constitute a cause for discipline or denial of an application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 36.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11319.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, except as provided in subdivision (b), the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice constitute the minimum standard of conduct and performance for a licensee in any work or service performed that is addressed by those standards. If a licensee also is certified by the Board of Equalization, he or she shall follow the standards established by the Board of Equalization when fulfilling his or her responsibilities for assessment purposes.

(b) Until January 1, 2020, and notwithstanding subdivision (a), a licensee shall not be required to comply with provisions of the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice that provide a limitation on restricted
 appraisal reports to intended users other than or in addition to the client if all of the following are met:

(1) The licensee obtains the consent of the client in advance.

(2) The report the licensee prepares is not related to any of the following:

(A) A federally related real estate transaction.

(B) The purchase or refinance of a residential dwelling of one to four units.

(C) A transaction subject to Section 10232.5.

(3) The report does all of the following:

(A) Clearly identifies all intended users.

(B) States that the opinions and conclusions set forth in the report may not be understood properly without additional information that is in the appraiser’s workfile.

(C) States that there may be assumptions that the appraiser has not verified that may significantly impact the appraised value of the subject of the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 928, Sec. 1.   (SB 70)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11319.2.

(a) A license of a licensee or a certificate of a registrant shall be suspended automatically during any time that the licensee or registrant is incarcerated after conviction of a felony, regardless of whether the conviction has been appealed. The office shall, immediately upon receipt of the certified copy of the record of conviction, determine whether the license of the licensee or certificate of the registrant has been automatically suspended by virtue of the licensee’s or registrant’s incarceration, and if so, the duration of that suspension. The office shall notify the licensee or registrant in writing of the license or certificate suspension and of the right to elect to have the issue of penalty heard as provided in subdivision (d).

(b) If after a hearing
 before an administrative law judge from the Office of Administrative Hearings it is determined that the felony for which the licensee or registrant was convicted was substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant, the director upon receipt of the certified copy of the record of conviction, shall suspend the license or certificate until the time for appeal has elapsed, if an appeal has not been taken, or until the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or has otherwise become final, and until further order of the director.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a conviction of a charge of violating any federal statute or regulation or any statute or regulation of this state regulating dangerous drugs or controlled substances, or a conviction of Section 187, 261, 288, or former Section 262, of the Penal Code, shall be conclusively presumed to be substantially related to the qualifications,
 functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant and a hearing shall not be held on this issue. However, upon its own motion or for good cause shown, the director may decline to impose or may set aside the suspension when it appears to be in the interest of justice to do so, with due regard to maintaining the integrity of, and confidence in, the practice regulated by the office.

(d) (1) Discipline may be ordered against a licensee or registrant in accordance with the laws and regulations of the office when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or
 indictment.

(2) The issue of penalty shall be heard by an administrative law judge from the Office of Administrative Hearings. The hearing shall not be had until the judgment of conviction has become final or, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code, an order granting probation has been made suspending the imposition of sentence, except that a licensee or registrant may, at the licensee’s or registrant’s option, elect to have the issue of penalty decided before those time periods have elapsed. Where the licensee or registrant so elects, the issue of penalty shall be heard in the manner described in subdivision (b) at the hearing to determine whether the conviction was substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant. If the conviction of a licensee or registrant who has made this election is overturned on appeal, any discipline ordered pursuant to this section shall
 automatically cease. This subdivision does not prohibit the office from pursuing disciplinary action based on any cause other than the overturned conviction.

(e) The record of the proceedings resulting in a conviction, including a transcript of the testimony in those proceedings, may be received in evidence.

(f) Any other law setting forth a procedure for the suspension or revocation of a license or certificate issued by the office shall not apply to proceedings conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 4.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Scope of Practice [11320. - 11328.1.]

11320.

No person shall engage in federally related real estate appraisal activity governed by this part or assume or use the title of or any title designation or abbreviation as a licensed appraiser in this state without an active license as defined in Section 11302. Any person who willfully violates this provision is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both the imprisonment and fine. The possession of a license issued pursuant to this part does not preempt the application of other statutes including the requirement for specialized training or licensure pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 750) of Chapter 2.5 of
 Division 1 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 79.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11320.5.

No person or entity shall act in the capacity of an appraisal management company or represent itself to the public as an appraisal management company, either in its advertising or through its business name, without a certificate of registration from the bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 43.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11321.

(a) No person other than a state licensed real estate appraiser may assume or use that title or any title, designation, or abbreviation likely to create the impression of state licensure as a real estate appraiser in this state.

(b) No person other than a licensee may sign an appraisal in a federally related transaction. A trainee licensed pursuant to Section 11327 may sign an appraisal in a federally related transaction if it is also signed by a licensee.

(c) No person other than a licensee holding a current valid license at the residential level issued under this part to perform, make,
 or approve and sign an appraisal may use the abbreviation SLREA in his or her real property appraisal business.

(d) No person other than a licensee holding a current valid license at a certified level issued under this part to perform, make, or approve and sign an appraisal may use the term “state certified real estate appraiser” or the abbreviation SCREA in his or her real property appraisal business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 62.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.

No licensee shall engage in any appraisal activity if his or her compensation is dependent on or affected by the value conclusion generated by the appraisal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 63.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11324.

An individual who is not a licensee may assist in the preparation of an appraisal in a federally related transaction under the following conditions:

(a) The assistance is under the direct supervision of an individual who is a licensed appraiser and the final conclusion as to value is made by a licensed appraiser.

(b) The final appraisal document in a federally related transaction is approved and signed, with acceptance of full responsibility, by the supervising individual who is licensed by the state pursuant to this part, identifies the assisting individual, and identifies the scope of work performed by the
 individual who assisted in preparation of the appraisal in a federally related transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 64.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.

(a) The director shall adopt regulations which determine the parameters of appraisal work which may be performed by licensed appraisers.

(b) Regulations adopted by the director pursuant to this section shall, at a minimum, meet the standards established by federal financial institution regulatory agencies as required by Section 1112 of Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, Public Law 101-73.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 439, Sec. 13.   Effective September 12, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11326.

(a) The county assessor shall, upon request, disclose information, furnish abstracts, copies of maps, construction permits, notices of completion, sales confirmation, and permit access to all records in the county assessor’s office or branch offices, to the Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers when it is conducting an investigation related to professional conduct of appraisers.

(b) Whenever the assessor discloses information, furnishes abstracts, and all of the above and permits access to records to the Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers, the bureau shall reimburse the assessor for any reasonable cost incurred as a result thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 44.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.

The director shall adopt regulations governing the process and procedure of applying for a trainee license, which shall meet, at a minimum, the requirements of the Appraisal Foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 837, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

11328.

To substantiate documentation of appraisal experience, or to facilitate the investigation of illegal or unethical activities by a licensee, applicant, or other person acting in a capacity that requires a license, that licensee, applicant, or person shall, upon the request of the director, submit copies of the engagement letters, appraisals, or any work product that is addressed by the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice, and all supporting documentation and data to the bureau. This material shall be confidential in accordance with the confidentiality provisions of the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 45.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11328.1.

If the director has a reasonable belief that a registrant, or person or entity acting in a capacity that requires a certificate of registration, has engaged in activities prohibited under this part, the director may submit a written request to the registrant, person, or entity, requesting copies of written material related to the director’s investigation. Any registrant, person, or entity receiving a written request from the director for information related to an investigation of prohibited activities shall submit that information to the director or the bureau within a reasonable period of time, which shall be specified by the director in the written request. Any material submitted shall be kept confidential by the director and the
 bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 46.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Licenses and Certification Application [11340. - 11347.]

11340.

The director shall adopt regulations governing the process and the procedure of applying for a license that shall include, but not be limited to, necessary experience or education, equivalency, and minimum requirements of the Appraisal Foundation, if any.

(a) For purposes of the educational background requirements established under this section, the director shall do both of the following:

(1) Grant credits for any courses taken on real estate appraisal ethics or practices pursuant to Section 10153.2, or that are deemed by the director to meet standards established pursuant to this part and federal law.

(2) Require the completion of a course on state and federal laws regulating the appraisal profession, as approved by the bureau every two years. The course shall include an examination that requires an applicant to demonstrate the applicant’s knowledge of those laws.

(b) For the purpose of implementing and applying this section, the director shall prescribe by regulation “equivalent courses” and “equivalent experience.” The experience of employees of an assessor’s office or of the State Board of Equalization in setting forth opinions of value of real property for tax purposes shall be deemed equivalent to experience in federally related real estate appraisal activity. Notwithstanding any other law, a holder of a valid real estate broker license shall be deemed to have completed appraisal
 license application experience requirements upon proof that the applicant has accumulated 1,000 hours of experience in the valuation of real property.

(c) The director shall adopt regulations for licensure that shall meet, at a minimum, the requirements and standards established by the Appraisal Foundation and the federal financial institutions regulatory agencies acting pursuant to Section 1112 of the Financial Institutions Reform Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989 (FIRREA) (Public Law 101-73). The director shall, by regulation, require the application for a real estate appraiser license to include the applicant’s social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(d) In evaluating the experience of any applicant for a license, regardless of the number of
 hours required of that applicant, the director shall apply the same standards to the experience of all applicants.

(e) (1) Beginning January 1, 2023, in addition to the requirements set forth in this section, an applicant for licensure shall complete at least one hour of instruction in cultural competency.

(2) For purposes of this section, “cultural competency” means understanding and applying cultural and ethnic data to the process of providing services that includes, but is not limited to, information on the appropriate
 services for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, and intersex communities, ethnic communities, and religious communities.

(f) No license shall be issued to an applicant who is less than 18 years of age.

(g) The cost of any educational course required by this section shall not be borne by any client served by a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 352, Sec. 3.   (AB 948)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11341.

A license issued with an effective date of January 1, 2000, or later shall be valid for two years unless otherwise extended or limited by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 974, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11343.

(a) Each real estate appraiser license applicant and each controlling person of each applicant for registration as an appraisal management company shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice via LiveScan for the purposes of allowing the bureau to obtain information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests and also information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on
 the person’s own recognizance pending trial or appeal. If the applicant is located out of state, then the applicant shall include the applicant’s fingerprint card with the application package and the bureau shall submit the fingerprint cards to the Department of Justice for the purposes of this subdivision.

(b) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The
 Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the bureau.

(c) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the bureau pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(d) The bureau shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in subdivision (a).

(e) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 47.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11344.
